Colorado, session 2026A, HB1331.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-303.3, add (3)(g),
(3)(h), and (4) as follows:
2-3-303.3. Interim committees - repeal.
(3) (g) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, THE
LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL SHALL NOT PRIORITIZE ANY INTERIM COMMITTEES OR
APPROVE ANY TASK FORCES FOR THE 2026 INTERIM. NOTHING IN THIS
SUBSECTION (3)(g) PROHIBITS THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE
LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL, WHETHER BEFORE OR AFTER THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
HAS ADJOURNED, FROM APPROVING AN INTERIM COMMITTEE BY RESOLUTION
FOR THE 2026 INTERIM IN THE MANNER SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (3)(c) OF
THIS SECTION.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(II) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(g) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(h) (I) DURING THE 2026 INTERIM, AN INTERIM COMMITTEE SHALL
NOT REQUEST MORE THAN FIVE BILLS TO BE DRAFTED AND SHALL NOT
RECOMMEND MORE THAN THREE BILLS FOR INTRODUCTION IN THE 2027
REGULAR SESSION.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(h) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION TO THE CONTRARY, AN
INTERIM COMMITTEE SHALL ONLY MEET DURING THE INTERIM.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-307, add (3)(e) as
follows:
2-2-307. Compensation of members - reimbursement of expenses
- definitions - repeal.
(3) (e) NOTWITHSTANDING THIS SECTION OR ANY OTHER PROVISION
OF LAW, A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY WHO IS APPOINTED TO A
STATUTORILY CREATED INTERIM COMMITTEE IS NOT ENTITLED TO PER DIEM
AND TRAVEL EXPENSES FOR ATTENDANCE AT A MEETING OF THE INTERIM
COMMITTEE DURING THE 2026 INTERIM.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-326, add (1)(c) as
follows:
2-2-326. Compensation and expenses for members appointed to
and serving on state entities - definition - repeal.
(1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary:
(c) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION (1),
A MEMBER SERVING ON A STATE ENTITY DURING THE 2026 INTERIM IS NOT
ENTITLED TO RECEIVE THE AMOUNT SPECIFIED IN SECTION 2-2-307 (3)(a) FOR
NECESSARY ATTENDANCE AT MEETINGS OF THE STATE ENTITY AND
REIMBURSEMENT FOR ALL ACTUAL AND NECESSARY TRAVEL AND
SUBSISTENCE EXPENSES INCURRED IN CONNECTION WITH ATTENDANCE AT
MEETINGS OF THE STATE ENTITY.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1331

(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-2-2507, amend (4)
and (6) as follows:
2-2-2507. Legislation inside advisory council review committee
- created - repeal.
(4) (a) The review committee shall not meet more than three times
during each interim. A majority of voting members constitutes a quorum.
(b) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE
REVIEW COMMITTEE SHALL NOT MEET DURING THE 2026 INTERIM.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (4)(b) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(6) (a) The review committee may recommend up to a total of three
bills during each interim. Legislation recommended by the review
committee is treated as legislation recommended by an interim committee
for purposes of applicable deadlines, bill introduction limits, and any other
requirements imposed by the joint rules of the general assembly.
(b) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE
REVIEW COMMITTEE SHALL NOT RECOMMEND LEGISLATION DURING THE
2026 INTERIM.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (6)(b) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-1302, amend (3)
as follows:
2-3-1302. Capital development committee established.
(3) The capital development committee shall not travel or take field
trips during the 2025 interim AND 2026 INTERIMS.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal part 15 of article
3 of title 2.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-1901, add
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1331

(2)(a)(III) and (2)(e)(VI) as follows:
2-3-1901. Legislative oversight committee for Colorado jail
standards - creation - duties - repeal.
(2) Duties.
(a) (III) (A) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT MEET DURING THE 2026 INTERIM.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a)(III) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2027.
(e) (VI) (A) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2)(e)(I) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT RECOMMEND LEGISLATION DURING
THE 2026 INTERIM.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(e)(VI) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2027.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-2103, add (6)(d),
(7)(c), and (8)(c) as follows:
2-3-2103. American Indian affairs interim committee - creation
- duties - membership - reporting - repeal.
(6) (d) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTIONS (6)(a) AND (6)(b) OF
THIS SECTION, THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT MEET DURING THE 2026 INTERIM.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (6)(d) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(7) (c) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT RECOMMEND LEGISLATION DURING THE 2026
INTERIM.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (7)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(8) (c) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (8)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT SEEK PRESENTATIONS AND COMMENTS DURING
THE 2026 INTERIM.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1331

(II) THIS SUBSECTION (8)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 10-16-221.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-22-107, add (1)(d)
and (5)(d) as follows:
10-22-107. Colorado health insurance exchange oversight
committee - creation - duties - repeal.
(1) (d) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT MEET DURING THE 2026 INTERIM.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(d) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(5) (d) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL AND
SHALL NOT RECOMMEND LEGISLATION DURING THE 2026 INTERIM.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (5)(d) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.9-103, add
(2)(a)(III) and (2)(a)(IV) as follows:
18-1.9-103. Legislative oversight committee concerning the
treatment of persons with behavioral health disorders in the criminal
and juvenile justice systems - creation - duties - repeal.
(2) Duties.
(a) (III) (A) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2)(a)(II) OF THIS
SECTION, COMMITTEE MEMBERS ARE NOT REQUIRED TO ATTEND OR CALL
INTO A REGULAR TASK FORCE MEETING DURING THE 2026 INTERIM. A
MEMBER WHO ATTENDS A REGULAR TASK FORCE MEETING DURING THE 2026
INTERIM IS NOT ENTITLED TO PER DIEM OR EXPENSES.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a)(III) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2027.
(IV) (A) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION,
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1331

THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT MEET DURING THE 2026 INTERIM.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a)(IV) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2027.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.9-104, amend
(2)(h) as follows:
18-1.9-104. Task force concerning the treatment of persons with
behavioral health disorders in the criminal and juvenile justice systems
- creation - membership - duties - repeal.
(2) Membership - terms.
(h) (I) Members of the task force serve without compensation.
However, members of the task force appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(c)
of this section may receive reimbursement for actual and necessary
expenses associated with their duties on the task force.
(II) (A) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2)(h)(I) OF THIS SECTION,
MEMBERS OF THE TASK FORCE APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(c)
OF THIS SECTION SHALL NOT RECEIVE REIMBURSEMENT FOR ACTUAL AND
NECESSARY EXPENSES ASSOCIATED WITH THEIR DUTIES ON THE TASK FORCE
DURING THE 2026 INTERIM.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(h)(II) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2027.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-51.1-101, add (8)
as follows:
24-51.1-101. Pension review commission - repeal.
(8) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION AND THE SUBCOMMITTEE SHALL NOT MEET DURING THE 2026
INTERIM AND LEGISLATIVE MEMBERS OF THE SUBCOMMITTEE ARE NOT
REQUIRED TO ATTEND THE MEETINGS AND HEARINGS SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION DURING THE 2026 INTERIM. IF A
LEGISLATIVE MEMBER OF THE SUBCOMMITTEE ATTENDS A MEETING OR
HEARING SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION DURING THE 2026
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1331

INTERIM, THE LEGISLATIVE MEMBER IS NOT ENTITLED TO PER DIEM
COMPENSATION. THE SUBCOMMITTEE IS NOT REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH
THE REVIEW AND REPORTING REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (4)
OF THIS SECTION DURING THE 2026 INTERIM.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (8) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 37-98-102, add
(1)(a)(III) as follows:
37-98-102. Water resources and agriculture review committee
- creation - repeal.
(1) (a) (III) (A) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT MEET DURING THE 2026-27 STATE
FISCAL YEAR.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(a)(III) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2027.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 37-98-103, add (1)(c)
as follows:
37-98-103. Annual recommendations - bill limitation - deadlines
for introduction - repeal.
(1) (c) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT RECOMMEND LEGISLATION DURING THE 2026
INTERIM.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-21-403, amend
(1)(h)(I); and add (2)(a)(I)(C), (2)(d)(III), and (2)(e)(III) as follows:
39-21-403. Legislative oversight committee concerning tax policy
- creation - duties - report - repeal.
(1) Creation.
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1331

(h) (I) (A) Members of the committee are entitled to receive
compensation and reimbursement of expenses as provided in section
2-2-326.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(h)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION,
MEMBERS OF THE COMMITTEE ARE NOT ENTITLED TO RECEIVE
COMPENSATION AND REIMBURSEMENT OF EXPENSES AS PROVIDED IN SECTION
2-2-326 IN THE 2026 INTERIM. THIS SUBSECTION (1)(h)(I)(B) IS REPEALED,
EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(2) Duties.
(a) (I) (C) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I)(A) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT MEET DURING THE 2026 INTERIM. THIS
SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I)(C) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
(d) (III) (A) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2)(d)(I) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT RECOMMEND LEGISLATION DURING
THE 2026 INTERIM.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(d)(III) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2027.
(e) (III) (A) THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT SUBMIT A REPORT ON OR
BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(e)(III) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2027.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-26-802, add (3)(c)
and (5)(c) as follows:
39-26-802. Sales and use tax simplification task force - creation
- definitions - repeal.
(3) (c) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
THE TASK FORCE SHALL NOT MEET DURING THE 2026 INTERIM.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1331

(5) (c) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION,
THE TASK FORCE SHALL NOT MAKE A REPORT FOR THE 2026 INTERIM.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (5)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 43-2-145, add
(1)(b)(III) as follows:
43-2-145. Transportation legislation review - committee -
definition - repeal.
(1) (b) (III) (A) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(b)(I) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT MEET OR RECOMMEND LEGISLATION
DURING THE 2026 INTERIM AND THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR.
NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTIONS (1)(c), (1.5), AND (1.9) OF THIS SECTION,
THE COMMITTEE SHALL NOT CONDUCT ANY OF THE REVIEWS AUTHORIZED BY
SUBSECTIONS (1)(c), (1.5), AND (1.9) OF THIS SECTION DURING THE 2026-27
STATE FISCAL YEAR.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(b)(III) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2027.
SECTION 19. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 legislative
appropriation bill. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
to implement this act, appropriations made in House Bill 26-1333 for the
2026-27 state fiscal year for the legislative department are adjusted as
follows:
(a) The general fund appropriation for the general assembly is
decreased by $183,699;
(b) The general fund appropriation for the legislative council is
decreased by $161,162, and the related FTE is decreased by 1.9 FTE; and
(c) The general fund appropriation for the committee on legal
services is decreased by $108,336, and the related FTE is decreased by 1.4
FTE.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in House Bill 26-1333 for the 2026-27 state fiscal year if:
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1331

(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in House
Bill 26-1333 for the 2026-27 state fiscal year for the general assembly is
less than the amount of the adjustments required in subsection (1)(a) of this
section;
(b) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in House
Bill 26-1333 for the 2026-27 state fiscal year for the legislative council is
less than the amount of the adjustments required in subsection (1)(b) of this
section;
(c) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in House
Bill 26-1333 for the 2026-27 state fiscal year for the committee on legal
services is less than the amount of the adjustments required in subsection
(1)(c) of this section; or
(d) House Bill 26-1333 for the 2026-27 state fiscal year does not
include an appropriation for the legislative department.
SECTION 20. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 19 of this act takes effect only if House Bill 26-1333 for
the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which case section 19 takes
effect upon the effective date of this act or of the House Bill 26-1333 for
state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 21. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1331

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1331